Utah statutes.
72-5-302.   Rights-of-way across federal lands -- Title -- Presumption -- Scope.

(1)  This part applies to all R.S. 2477 rights-of-way.

(2)  The state and its political subdivisions have title to the R.S. 2477 rights-of-ways in accordance with Sections 72-3-102, 72-3-103, 72-3-104, 72-3-105, and 72-5-103.

(3) (a)  Acceptance of a right-of-way for the construction of a highway over public lands, not reserved for public uses, is presumed if the state or a political subdivision of the state makes a finding that the highway was constructed and the right-of-way was accepted prior to October 21, 1976.

(b)  The existence of a highway in a condition suitable for public use establishes a presumption that the highway has continued in use in its present location since the land over which it is built was public land not reserved for public use.

(4) (a)  Unless specifically determined prior to the cut-off date provided in Section 72-5-301 by the state or a political subdivision of the state with authority over the R.S. 2477 right-of-way, the scope of the R.S. 2477 right-of-way is that which is reasonable and necessary for all highway uses as of the cut-off date determined according to the facts and circumstances, including:

(i)  highway drainage facilities;

(ii)  shoulders adjacent to the right-of-way; and

(iii)  maintenance activities defined in Section 72-5-301 that are reasonable and necessary.

(b)  Unless specifically determined by the state or political subdivision of the state with the authority over the R.S. 2477 right-of-way, an R.S. 2477 right-of-way is presumed to be at least 66 feet wide if that is the usual width of highway rights-of-way in the area.

(c)  The scope of the R.S. 2477 right-of-way includes the right to widen the highway as necessary to accommodate the increased travel associated with those uses, up to, where applicable, improving a highway to two lanes so travelers can safely pass each other.

(5)  The safety standards established by the Department of Transportation in accordance with Section 72-6-102 apply to all determinations of safety on R.S. 2477 rights-of-way used for vehicular travel.



Amended by Chapter 293, 2003 General Session

